Utah statutes.
10-6-140.   Warrants for payment of claims.

In the event the city is without funds on deposit in one of its appropriate bank accounts with which to pay any lawfully approved claim, the city auditor or recorder shall draw and sign a warrant upon the treasurer of the city for payment of the claim, the warrant to be tendered to the payee named thereon.



Enacted by Chapter 26, 1979 General Session

